Utah statutes.
78B-1-131.   Witnesses -- Liability to forfeiture and damages.
A witness who disobeys a subpoena shall, in addition to any penalty imposed
for contempt, be liable to the party aggrieved in the sum of $100, and all
damages sustained by the failure of the witness to attend.  Forfeiture and
damages may be recovered in a civil action.
